Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201284-1216
Administrator; rules and regulations;
promulgate.

The administrator shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as may be necessary
or proper to effectuate the purposes of the
Records Management Act. Those portions thereof which relate to
functions specifically delegated to the board shall be approved and concurred
in by the board.

Laws 1961, c. 455, § 16, p. 1393;

Laws 1979, LB 559, § 8;

Laws 2012, LB719, § 23.